Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2584.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 308.1 of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 308.1. Consumer protection and information.* * *(c) Database of rate increases.--(1) The commission shall, not later than 120 days after the effective date of this paragraph, create and maintain a centralized public database of all rates the commission oversees. All information available must be searchable, at minimum, by company, entity, type of utility, year or docket number. The commission shall make the database available on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website and, 1234567891011121314151617 when the commission receives a rate increase request, the database shall be updated with the information not later than 10 days after the commission's receipt of the request. The database must contain all information available for each rate the commission oversees, including rate increase requests, for the previous 20 years, at a minimum.(2) The commission may contract with a third party to operate the database required by this subsection.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2584PN3494 - 2 - 123456789